Utah statutes.
73-10-24.   Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund created.

There is created a Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund to further enhance the state's ability to carry out the policy described in Section 73-10-1.  The fund shall be administered by the Board of Water Resources.  The fund is a revolving fund established for the construction, operation, and maintenance of projects considered by the board to be outside the scope of financing by the Water Resources Construction Fund, as created by Section 73-10-8, and shall include, but not be limited to, flood control projects.

